Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,114
Practicing profession or business without credential; injunction.

Any person engaging in the practice of any profession or business without the appropriate credential may be restrained by temporary and permanent injunctions.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 63, p. 471;

C.S.1929, § 71-801;

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 17, p. 546;

R.S.1943, § 71-164;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 48;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-164;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 114.

A person engaging in the practice of medicine and surgery without the required statutory license may be restrained by injunction. State ex rel. Johnson v. Wagner, 139 Neb. 471, 297 N.W. 906 (1941).

Under former statute, an injunction would not lie to prevent an unlicensed chiropractor from practicing, as a criminal action was deemed to afford an adequate remedy at law. State v. Maltby, 108 Neb. 578, 188 N.W. 175 (1922).